Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 32. Department of Administration and Information

History.

2021 ch. 56, § 2, effective April 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-3201.
Creation.

The department of administration and information is created.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:49; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2001; Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1001

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

Cited

in

Wagoner v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 924 P.2d 88,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 9-2-3202.
Definitions; powers generally; duties of governor; provisions construed; cooperation with legislature and judiciary; divisions enumerated.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means an office, department, board, commission or operating unit of the executive branch of state government;

“Department” means the department of administration and information;

“Executive branch” means the executive department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“Judiciary” means the judicial department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“Legislature” means the legislative department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“This act” means W.S.

9-2-3201

through

9-2-3221

.

“Contract employee” means an employee who is hired by any agency for a limited period of time, pursuant to rules promulgated by the human resources division in W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F);

“Competitive employment” means work in the competitive labor market that is performed on a full-time or part-time basis in an integrated setting, and for which an individual is compensated at or above the minimum wage, but not less than the customary wage and level of benefits paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by individuals who are not disabled;

“Employment first” means a concept to facilitate the full inclusion of individuals with disabilities in the workplace and community. Under the employment first approach, community based, integrated employment is the first option for employment services for children and adults with disabilities. Employment first includes competitive employment in an integrated setting;

“Integrated setting” means with respect to an employment outcome, a setting typically found in the community in which applicants or eligible individuals interact with individuals who do not have disabilities, other than nondisabled individuals who are providing services to those applicants or eligible individuals, to the same extent that individuals who do not have disabilities interact with other persons in comparable positions;

The department may assist the governor in discharging his duties as chief executive and administrative officer of the executive branch of government of the state of Wyoming. The governor through the department shall:

Improve techniques used for management of state government;

Coordinate, consolidate and provide services which are used by more than one (1) agency;

Review agency programs, expenditures and management to identify problems and suggest improvements;

Promote economy and efficiency in government; and

Establish uniform standards of administration.

This act shall be construed to provide the governor, through the department, with a more coordinated and responsive system of management of the executive branch of state government, and to preserve and protect the separation of powers mandated by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution. The legislature and the judiciary shall cooperate with the department and may utilize the services and assistance of the department to achieve economy in government, but procedures affecting the administration of the legislature shall be determined by the legislature and the management council, and procedures affecting the administration of the judiciary shall be determined by the judges for their respective courts, and they shall not be bound by rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

The department shall consist of the following divisions in addition to the office of the director of the department:

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 5.

General services division;

Human resources division;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 2.

Economic analysis division;

and (viii) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 178, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 2.

State library division.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, §§ 2, 3, 14; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-276.18:50, 9-276.18:51, 9-276.18:62; Laws 1975, ch. 174, § 1; 1976, ch. 26, § 1; 1977, ch. 180, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-2002 Sp. Sess., 9-3-2003, 9-3-2014; Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 2; 1980, ch. 63, § 200; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 178, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 71, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 33, § 1; 2001, ch. 17, § 1; 2008, ch. 11, § 1; 2009, ch. 129, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 4; 2014 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, §§ 3, 4, 5, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 56, §§ 2, 4, 6, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

repealed (d)(i), which read, "Budget division."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-3203.
Director and division administrators; appointment; removal; powers of director.

The governor shall appoint a director of the department with the advice and consent of the senate who shall be the department’s executive and administrative head, and who shall hold an ex officio seat on all boards and councils which advise or are within the department.

With the approval of the governor, the director may appoint administrators for each of the divisions. The governor may remove the director and division administrators as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The director may:

Employ professional, technical and other assistants to work in the director’s office or in any of the divisions, along with other employees necessary to carry out the purpose of this act [§§

9-2-1001

through

9-2-1026

.13];

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 6.

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations to administer this act pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

];

Formulate through his office the policies and programs to be carried out by the department through its respective divisions.

The director shall administer through his office all accounting, billing and collection functions required by the department.

The director shall administer through his office or through a division of the department, the duties of the department under the State Employees’ and Officials’ Group Insurance Act.

The director shall administer through his office or through a division of the department the duties required under W.S. 35-11-112(d).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:54; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2006; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, §§ 3, 6; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2019 ch. 71, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1003

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “or the information technology division” after “through his office” in (c)(iv).

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2019 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2019, ch. 71, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 19, 2019.

State Employees' and Officials' Group Insurance Act. —

See §§

9-3-202

, 9-3-203(a)(xiv).

Stated

in

Wagoner v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 924 P.2d 88,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1996).